Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB510.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 311 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Death declaration" means the formal determination of death made by a hospital physician, in
accordance with accepted medical standards and applicable state and federal law, based on either the
irreversible cessation of:
1. Circulatory and respiratory functions; or
2. Functions of the entire brain, including the brain stem;
(b) "Donation after brain death" or "DBD" means the organ recovery process that may occur following
death by irreversible cessation of cerebral and brain stem function that is characterized by an
absence of electrical activity in the brain, blood flow to the brain, and brain function, as determined
by clinical assessment of responses;
(c) "Donation after circulatory death" or "DCD" means the organ recovery process that may occur
following death by irreversible cessation of circulatory and respiratory functions;
(d) "Indication of life" includes but is not limited to:
1. Spontaneous movement;
2. Vocalization or attempts to vocalize;
3. Purposeful or reflexive responses to stimuli;
4. Observed respiratory effort by a patient-initiated attempt at breath;
5. Changes in heart rate or blood pressure inconsistent with a death declaration; and
6. Any neurological or physiological sign suggesting pain perception or neurological activity;
(e) "Neurological status" means the clinical assessment of brain and nervous system function, including
level of consciousness, reflexes, responsiveness, and indicators of pain perception;
(f) "Organ donation" has the same meaning as anatomical gift in KRS 311.1911; and
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(g) "Pause in procedure" means the immediate suspension of any organ donation recovery,
preservation, or procurement activity.
(2) (a) During any organ donation recovery, preservation, or procurement activity for a DCD or DBD, a
pause in procedure shall be initiated if any individual included in paragraph (b) of this subsection
reports on any of the following:
1. Observed or suspected change in neurological status;
2. Observed or suspected indication of life; or
3. Uncertainty regarding the accuracy or completeness of neurological status or death
declaration assessments.
(b) A pause in procedure may be requested or initiated by any individual involved or present, including
but not limited to:
1. Hospital physicians, nurses, or clinical staff;
2. Organ procurement organization personnel;
3. Transplant center personnel;
4. Members of the surgical or anesthesiology team; and
5. The patient’s spouse or legal representative.
(c) An individual shall not be penalized, disciplined, or retaliated against for requesting or initiating a
pause in procedure.
(3) If a pause in procedure is initiated during any organ donation recovery, preservation, or procurement
activity for a DCD or DBD:
(a) All organ donation recovery, preservation, or procurement activities shall cease;
(b) A comprehensive reassessment of the patient's neurological and physiological status shall be
conducted by the hospital’s clinical team;
(c) Organ donation recovery, preservation, or procurement activity shall not be resumed until the
patient's neurological function is reassessed and a DCD or DBD is determined and deemed
appropriate by a hospital physician;
(d) All determinations regarding patient status shall remain under the sole and exclusive authority of the
treating hospital and physicians; and
(e) A patient shall not be denied appropriate comfort care, nutrition, hydration, or life-sustaining
treatment solely for the purpose of facilitating organ donation.
(4) Any pause in procedure shall be documented in the patient's medical record by the treating hospital and
physician. The documentation shall include but not be limited to:
(a) The reason for the pause in procedure;
(b) Observations triggering the pause in procedure;
(c) Reassessment findings; and
(d) Final determinations.
(5) (a) All pauses in procedure as described in this section shall be reported to:
1. All applicable federal oversight entities in accordance with federal law; or
2. Any entity directed by the United States Department of Health and Human Services, Health
Resources and Services Administration (HRSA) to receive the pause in procedure report and
any oversight and corrective guidelines.
(b) A copy of reports required under paragraph (a) of this subsection and any follow-up reporting shall
be forwarded to the Cabinet for Health and Family Services.

CHAPTER 43 3
(6) The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall, by October 1, 2026, and by October 1 of each year
thereafter, submit a report to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the Interim Joint
Committee on Health Services that provides an overview of:
(a) Pause in procedure cases and outcomes; and
(b) Any corrective actions related to pause and procedure cases issued by HRSA.
(7) (a) Failure of a person or entity to comply with this section may result in administrative actions,
including but not limited to:
1. Reports to appropriate licensing or certification authorities;
2. Suspension of organ donation recovery, preservation, or procurement activities in the
Commonwealth; and
3. Assessment of civil penalties.
(b) The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall promulgate administrative regulations in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to implement and enforce this section.
(c) A health care professional or any employee of a hospital who has knowledge of a failure to comply
with the requirements of subsection (2) of this section shall immediately report the failure to the
Cabinet for Health and Family Services.
(8) This section shall not be construed to:
(a) Conflict with the determination death under KRS 446.400;
(b) Discourage ethical organ donation;
(c) Interfere with independent end-of-life decision making;
(d) Conflict with the Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act; or
(e) Authorize the Commonwealth to suspend, revoke, or otherwise affect the federal certification,
designation, or service area of an organ procurement organization, which shall remain under the
exclusive authority of the United States Department of Health and Human Services.
(9) If any provision of this section or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the section that can be given effect without the
invalid provisions or application, and to this end the provisions of this section are severable.
Signed by Governor April 7, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version